Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-1141.3] Use of seclusion, chemical
restraint, or mechanical restraint prohibited. [Section effective
August 1, 2016.] The use of seclusion, chemical restraint, or mechanical
restraint shall be prohibited in public schools regardless of any consent of
the student, parents, or guardians. [L 2014, c 206, pt of §2]

Note

Report to 2018 legislature on department's progress in
implementing use of restraint statutes and expenditure of funds. L 2016, c
151, §1.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next